District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.05

Workforce job development grant-making authority.

(a)

The Director of the Department of Employment Services (“DOES”) may issue grants in accordance with applicable federal and District law to individuals and organizations from the funds made available to the DOES pursuant to local appropriations or, in coordination with the Workforce Investment Council, pursuant to the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 936; 29 U.S.C § 2822), for workforce development purposes, including increasing occupational skills, job retention, employment opportunities, and earnings of the District’s workforce pursuant to:

(1)

Section 32-241;

(2)

Section 32-242;

(3)

Section 32-752;

(4)

Sections 32-1331 and 32-1332; and

(5)

Section 32-1610.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 47-368.06, grants that may be issued pursuant to this section include grants that the Mayor, Director of the DOES, or an agency receives through an intra-District transfer, a memorandum of understanding, or a reprogramming from an agency lacking grant-making authority.

(c)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

(d)

By July 30, 2013, the Director of DOES shall submit to the Council a report providing an analysis of, and corrective actions for any problems pertaining to, the following issues related to contracting and procurement processing with DOES:

(1)

The procedures through which DOES processes and issues grants;

(2)

The average timeframe in which a contract is processed; and

(3)

The common delays to grant issuance.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-269, § 2, 60 DCR 2136
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-80, § 2(a), 63 DCR 766
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-80 substituted “may issue grants in accordance with applicable federal and District law” for “may issue competitive grants” in the introductory language of (a).
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-269, § 3 (sunset provision), see § 2 of the Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Reauthorization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-16, July 22, 2015, 62 DCR 6874).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2 of the Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-55, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6390, 20 DCSTAT 1403).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-269, § 3 (sunset provision), see § 2 of the Workforce Job Development Grant-Making Reauthorization Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-52, May 6, 2015, 62 DCR 5948, 21 DCSTAT 1427).

Sunset provision: Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-269 provided that the act shall sunset 2 years after April 23, 2013.

Sunset provision repealed: Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 21-80 repealed D.C. Law 19-269, § 3.